Maryland, session 2025, HB0227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
17–304.
(b) Any stock or other certificate of ownership, or any dividend, profit,
distribution, interest, payment on principal, or other sum held by a business association for
– 1 –

Ch. 212 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
or to a shareholder, certificate holder, member, bondholder or other security holder, or
participating patron of a cooperative is presumed abandoned 3 years after the later of:
(1) The date the holder is deemed to no longer have a valid address for the
owner of the property; or
(2) The date the owner last communicated with the business association
regarding the property if:
(i) It is held by a business association organized under the laws of
or created in this State;
(ii) It is held by a business association doing business in this State
but not organized under the laws of this State, and the records of the business association
indicate that the last known address of the person entitled to it is in this State; or
(iii) It is held by a business association not doing business in this
State and not organized under the laws of this State, but the records of the business
association indicate that the last known address of the person entitled to it is in this State.
(g) This section does not apply to [any]:
(1) ANY stock or other intangible ownership interest enrolled in a plan that
provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions, or other sums payable
as a result of the interest unless the records available to the Administrator of the plan
show, with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the reinvestment
plan, that:
[(1)] (I) The holder is deemed to no longer have a valid address for the
owner of the stock or other intangible ownership interest; or
[(2)] (II) The owner has not within 3 years communicated in any manner
described in subsection (c)(2) of this section; OR
(2) NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS, AS DEFINED IN § 5–650.1 OF THE
CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Cooperative” means a corporation that:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 212
(1) Is organized under this subtitle; or
(2) Becomes subject to this subtitle in the manner provided in this subtitle.
5–605.
A cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporation may be organized under this
subtitle for the purpose of supplying, promoting, and extending the use of electricity.
5–650.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS” MEANS MONEY:
(1) DUE TO ANY PAST MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE IN RETIREMENT
OF CAPITAL ALLOCATED ON A PATRONAGE BASIS TO THE ACCOUNT OF THE PAST
MEMBER FOR AMOUNTS RECEIVED AND RECEIVABLE BY THE COOPERATIVE IN
EXCESS OF OPERATING COSTS AND EXPENSES;
(2) FOR WHICH AT LEAST 5 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE CREDITS
WERE RETIRED; AND
(3) THAT HAS NOT BEEN CLAIMED BY THE PAST MEMBER.
(B) A COOPERATIVE MAY USE NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS ONLY TO:
(1) ASSIST MEMBERS OF THE COOPERATIVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE POWERS GRANTED TO THE COOPERATIVE UNDER § 5–607 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
OR
(2) MAKE DONATIONS TO NONPROFIT, CHARITABLE ORGANIZATIONS
APPROVED BY THE COOPERATIVE’S BOARD OF DIRECTORS.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO RELIEVE A
COOPERATIVE OF THE OBLIGATION TO REFUND NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS ON
APPLICATION OF A PAST MEMBER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –